Florida, session 2026, SB770.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 61 62 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 119.011, Florida 63 Statutes, is amended to read: 64 119.011âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 65 (1)ââActual cost of duplicationâ means the cost of the 66 material and supplies used to duplicate the public record, but 67 does not include labor cost or overhead cost associated with 68 such duplication. The term includes the cost of agency 69 resources, including the cost of clerical and supervisory 70 assistance and costs incurred for the use of agency information 71 technology associated with such duplication which are incurred 72 by the agency in complying with a request for public records. 73 The cost of clerical or supervisory assistance may not be 74 greater than the base hourly rate of the lowest paid personnel 75 capable of providing such clerical or supervisory assistance. 76 The term does not include overhead costs associated with 77 duplication of a public record. 78 Section 2.âSection 119.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to 79 read: 80 119.07âInspection and copying of records; photographing 81 public records; fees; exemptions.â 82 (1)(a)âEvery person who has custody of a public record 83 shall permit the record to be inspected and copied by any person 84 desiring to do so, at any reasonable time, under reasonable 85 conditions, and under supervision by the custodian of the public 86 records. 87 (b)âA custodian of public records or a person having 88 custody of public records may designate another officer or 89 employee of the agency to permit the inspection and copying of 90 public records, but must disclose the identity of the designee 91 to the person requesting to inspect or copy public records. 92 (c)1.âA custodian of public records and his or her designee 93 must acknowledge requests to inspect or copy records promptly 94 and respond to such requests in good faith. A good faith 95 response includes making reasonable efforts to determine from 96 other officers or employees within the agency whether such a 97 record exists and, if so, the location at which the record can 98 be accessed. Failure to acknowledge a public records request 99 promptly and in good faith is a violation of this chapter. 100 2.a.âNo later than 3 business days after receiving a public 101 records request, a custodian of public records or his or her 102 designee must: 103 (I)âProvide the requested records; 104 (II)âProvide the requester a good faith estimate of a 105 reasonable amount of time in which the custodian will provide 106 the records, along with a good faith estimate of costs, if any, 107 that will be assessed for complying with the request; or 108 (III)âDeny the request and cite the statutory exemption 109 authorizing the denial as provided in paragraphs (e) and (f). 110 b.âIf the custodian of public records or his or her 111 designee fails to take any of the actions described in sub 112 subparagraph a. within 3 business days after receiving the 113 public records request, the agency may not impose costs or fees 114 for providing the requested public records. 115 c.âNotwithstanding sub-subparagraph a., there is no 116 presumption in any civil action brought to enforce a requesterâs 117 right to public records that a request was not unlawfully 118 delayed because an agency complied with sub-subparagraph a. 119 (d)âA person who has custody of a public record who asserts 120 that an exemption applies to a part of such record shall redact 121 that portion of the record to which an exemption has been 122 asserted and validly applies, and such person shall produce the 123 remainder of such record for inspection and copying. 124 (e)âIf the person who has custody of a public record 125 contends that all or part of the record is exempt from 126 inspection and copying, he or she must shall state the basis of 127 the exemption that he or she contends is applicable to the 128 record, including the statutory citation to an exemption created 129 or afforded by statute. 130 (f)âIf requested by the person seeking to inspect or copy 131 the record, the custodian of public records must shall state in 132 writing and with particularity: 133 1.âThe reasons that justify taking more than 15 days to 134 provide the requested records; or 135 2.âThe reasons for the conclusion that the record is exempt 136 or confidential, including all statutory citations relied upon 137 in determining that the record is exempt or confidential. 138 (g)1.âIn any civil action in which an exemption to this 139 section is asserted, if the exemption is alleged to exist under 140 or by virtue of s. 119.071(1)(d) or (f), (2)(d), (e), or (f), or 141 (4)(c), the public record or part thereof in question must shall 142 be submitted to the court for an inspection in camera. If an 143 exemption is alleged to exist under or by virtue of s. 144 119.071(2)(c), an inspection in camera is discretionary with the 145 court. If the court finds that the asserted exemption is not 146 applicable, it must shall order the public record or part 147 thereof in question to be immediately produced for inspection or 148 copying as requested by the person seeking such access. 149 2.âIn any civil action brought by a requester to enforce 150 the right to inspect public records, an agency may not assert 151 any exemption or justification for not providing the public 152 records sought which it has not previously raised before the 153 civil action was filed to justify the agencyâs nondisclosure or 154 delay in providing the public records sought. 155 3.âIn any civil action brought by a requester alleging that 156 an agency unlawfully delayed providing public records, a public 157 records request backlog or other unfulfilled public records 158 requests at the agency may not, in whole or in part, be deemed a 159 justification for the alleged delay. 160 (h)âEven if an assertion is made by the custodian of public 161 records that a requested record is not a public record subject 162 to public inspection or copying under this subsection, the 163 requested record must shall, nevertheless, not be disposed of 164 for a period of 30 days after the date on which a written 165 request to inspect or copy the record was served on or otherwise 166 made to the custodian of public records by the person seeking 167 access to the record. If a civil action is instituted within the 168 30-day period to enforce the provisions of this section with 169 respect to the requested record, the custodian of public records 170 may not dispose of the record except by order of a court of 171 competent jurisdiction after notice to all affected parties. 172 (i)âThe absence of a civil action instituted for the 173 purpose stated in paragraph (g) does not relieve the custodian 174 of public records of the duty to maintain the record as a public 175 record if the record is in fact a public record subject to 176 public inspection and copying under this subsection and does not 177 otherwise excuse or exonerate the custodian of public records 178 from any unauthorized or unlawful disposition of such record. 179 (2)(a)âAs an additional means of inspecting or copying 180 public records, a custodian of public records may provide access 181 to public records by remote electronic means, provided exempt or 182 confidential information is not disclosed. 183 (b)âThe custodian of public records shall provide 184 safeguards to protect the contents of public records from 185 unauthorized remote electronic access or alteration and to 186 prevent the disclosure or modification of those portions of 187 public records which are exempt or confidential from subsection 188 (1) or s. 24, Art. I of the State Constitution. 189 (c)âUnless otherwise required by law, the custodian of 190 public records may charge a fee for remote electronic access, 191 granted under a contractual arrangement with a user, which fee 192 may include the direct and indirect costs of providing such 193 access. Fees for remote electronic access provided to the 194 general public shall be in accordance with the provisions of 195 this section. 196 (3)(a)âAny person shall have the right of access to public 197 records for the purpose of making photographs of the record 198 while such record is in the possession, custody, and control of 199 the custodian of public records. 200 (b)âThis subsection applies to the making of photographs in 201 the conventional sense by use of a camera device to capture 202 images of public records but excludes the duplication of 203 microfilm in the possession of the clerk of the circuit court 204 where a copy of the microfilm may be made available by the 205 clerk. 206 (c)âPhotographing public records shall be done under the 207 supervision of the custodian of public records, who may adopt 208 and enforce reasonable rules governing the photographing of such 209 records. 210 (d)âPhotographing of public records shall be done in the 211 room where the public records are kept. If, in the judgment of 212 the custodian of public records, this is impossible or 213 impracticable, photographing shall be done in another room or 214 place, as nearly adjacent as possible to the room where the 215 public records are kept, to be determined by the custodian of 216 public records. Where provision of another room or place for 217 photographing is required, the expense of providing the same 218 shall be paid by the person desiring to photograph the public 219 record pursuant to paragraph (4)(h) (4)(e). 220 (4)âThe custodian of public records shall furnish a copy or 221 a certified copy of the record upon payment of the fee 222 prescribed by law. If a fee is not prescribed by law, the 223 following fees are authorized: 224 (a)âIf a fee is not prescribed by law, the following fees 225 are authorized: 226 1.âUp to 15 cents per one-sided copy for duplicated copies 227 of not more than 14 inches by 8 1/2 inches; 228 2.âNo more than an additional 5 cents for each two-sided 229 copy; and 230 3.âFor all other copies, the actual cost of duplication of 231 the public record. 232 233 If the nature or volume of the public records requested to be 234 inspected or copied is such that they require less than 30 235 minutes to prepare, the agency may not charge the actual cost of 236 duplication or any other costs or fees to the requester. 237 (b)1.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term âany 238 electronic medium stored, maintained, or used by an agencyâ 239 means any electronic format that the agency can reasonably 240 provide as part of the standard operation of its electronic 241 recordkeeping system. If an agency is able to convert the record 242 into the electronic format requested as a step in the process of 243 copying or exporting the requested record, the agency must 244 provide the record in the format requested and may charge a fee 245 authorized by this subsection. 246 2.âFor a copy of a public record in any electronic medium 247 stored, maintained, or used by an agency, the agency may charge 248 the actual cost of duplication. However, if the nature or volume 249 of the public records requested to be copied is such that they 250 require less than 30 minutes to prepare, the agency may not 251 charge the actual cost of duplication or any other costs or fees 252 to the requester. 253 3.âAn agency may not charge a requester the actual cost of 254 duplication or any other cost or fee for providing any public 255 record that has been previously disclosed pursuant to another 256 public records request made to that agency. 257 (c)âThe charge for copies of county maps or aerial 258 photographs supplied by county constitutional officers may also 259 include a reasonable charge for the labor and overhead 260 associated with their duplication. 261 (d)(c)âAn agency may charge up to $1 per copy for a 262 certified copy of a public record. 263 (e)(d)âAll fees allowed under this subsection may be 264 reduced or waived in full for a public purpose, including public 265 agency program support, nonprofit activities, journalistic 266 activities, and academic or other research. Fee reductions and 267 waivers must be uniformly applied among persons similarly 268 situated. For a public records request meeting the public 269 purposes noted in this paragraph, an agency may not charge the 270 requester any cost or fee for the first 10 hours of time the 271 agency estimates it would take to comply with the request If the 272 nature or volume of public records requested to be inspected or 273 copied pursuant to this subsection is such as to require 274 extensive use of information technology resources or extensive 275 clerical or supervisory assistance by personnel of the agency 276 involved, or both, the agency may charge, in addition to the 277 actual cost of duplication, a special service charge, which 278 shall be reasonable and shall be based on the cost incurred for 279 such extensive use of information technology resources or the 280 labor cost of the personnel providing the service that is 281 actually incurred by the agency or attributable to the agency 282 for the clerical and supervisory assistance required, or both. 283 (f)âIf requested by the person seeking to inspect or copy 284 the record, the custodian of public records must provide that 285 person a detailed written estimate of all costs associated with 286 the request. 287 (g)âAn agency is not authorized to charge a fee for costs 288 associated with redaction of exempt or confidential and exempt 289 information from a public record that has been requested to be 290 inspected or copied. 291 (h)1.(e)1.âWhere provision of another room or place is 292 necessary to photograph public records, the expense of providing 293 the same must shall be paid by the person desiring to photograph 294 the public records. 295 2.âThe custodian of public records may charge the person 296 making the photographs for supervision services at a rate of 297 compensation to be agreed upon by the person desiring to make 298 the photographs and the custodian of public records. If they 299 fail to agree as to the appropriate charge, the charge shall be 300 determined by the custodian of public records. 301 (5)âAn agency shall provide an electronic option for the 302 payment of any fee associated with a request to inspect or copy 303 public records. 304 (6)âWhen ballots are produced under this section for 305 inspection or examination, no persons other than the supervisor 306 of elections or the supervisorâs employees shall touch the 307 ballots. If the ballots are being examined before the end of the 308 contest period in s. 102.168, the supervisor of elections must 309 shall make a reasonable effort to notify all candidates by 310 telephone or otherwise of the time and place of the inspection 311 or examination. All such candidates, or their representatives, 312 shall be allowed to be present during the inspection or 313 examination. 314 (7)(6)âAn exemption contained in this chapter or in any 315 other general or special law shall not limit the access of the 316 Auditor General, the Office of Program Policy Analysis and 317 Government Accountability, or any state, county, municipal, 318 university, board of community college, school district, or 319 special district internal auditor to public records when such 320 person states in writing that such records are needed for a 321 properly authorized audit, examination, or investigation. Such 322 person shall maintain the exempt or confidential status of that 323 public record and shall be subject to the same penalties as the 324 custodian of that record for public disclosure of such record. 325 (8)(7)âAn exemption from this section does not imply an 326 exemption from s. 286.011. The exemption from s. 286.011 must be 327 expressly provided. 328 (9)(8)âThe provisions of this section are not intended to 329 expand or limit the provisions of Rule 3.220, Florida Rules of 330 Criminal Procedure, regarding the right and extent of discovery 331 by the state or by a defendant in a criminal prosecution or in 332 collateral postconviction proceedings. This section may not be 333 used by any inmate as the basis for failing to timely litigate 334 any postconviction action. 335 (10)(9)âAfter receiving a request to inspect or copy a 336 record, an agency may not respond to that request by filing an 337 action for declaratory relief against the requester to determine 338 whether the record is a public record as defined by s. 119.011, 339 or the status of the record as confidential or exempt from the 340 provisions of subsection (1). 341 Section 3.âSection 119.10, Florida Statutes, is amended to 342 read: 343 119.10âViolation of chapter; penalties.â 344 (1)âA violation of any law that provides access to public 345 records, including those laws that limit public access to such 346 records, is considered a violation of this chapter Any public 347 officer who: 348 (a)âViolates any provision of this chapter commits a 349 noncriminal infraction, punishable by fine not exceeding $500. 350 (b)âKnowingly violates the provisions of s. 119.07(1) is 351 subject to suspension and removal or impeachment and, in 352 addition, commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable 353 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 354 (2)âA person who violates this chapter commits a 355 noncriminal infraction, punishable by a fine that may not exceed 356 $500. 357 (3)âA Any person who willfully and knowingly violates: 358 (a)âany of the provisions of this chapter commits a 359 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 360 775.082 or s. 775.083. 361 (4)âA person outside this state who knowingly violates this 362 chapter commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 363 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 364 (5)âA court must assess a penalty against the agency equal 365 to twice the amount awarded pursuant to s. 119.12, in addition 366 to a penalty of $200 for each day the agency unlawfully denied 367 the right to inspect or copy the public records, if the court: 368 (a)âDetermines that an agency has: 369 1.âViolated s. 119.07(1); and 370 2.âShown intentional disregard for the publicâs 371 constitutional right of access as guaranteed by s. 24(a), Art. I 372 of the State Constitution; or 373 (b)âFinds a pattern of abuse of the requirements of this 374 chapter Section 119.105 commits a felony of the third degree, 375 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 376 Section 4.âSection 119.12, Florida Statutes, is amended to 377 read: 378 119.12âAttorney fees.â 379 (1)âThe court must assess against the agency responsible, 380 and award to the complainant the reasonable costs of 381 enforcement, including reasonable attorney fees and those fees 382 incurred litigating the entitlement and amount of fees awarded, 383 if: 384 (a)âA civil action is filed against an agency to enforce 385 the provisions of this chapter or any other law that relates to 386 access to public records, including those laws that limit public 387 access to such records, the court shall assess and award the 388 reasonable costs of enforcement, including reasonable attorney 389 fees, against the responsible agency if the court determines 390 that: 391 (a)âThe agency unlawfully refused to permit a public record 392 to be inspected or copied; and 393 (b)âThe court determines that such agency violated such law 394 The complainant provided written notice identifying the public 395 record request to the agencyâs custodian of public records at 396 least 5 business days before filing the civil action, except as 397 provided under subsection (2). The notice period begins on the 398 day the written notice of the request is received by the 399 custodian of public records, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and 400 legal holidays, and runs until 5 business days have elapsed. 401 (2)âFees assessed pursuant to this section may not be 402 assessed on an individual acting on the advice of an agency 403 attorney but must be assessed against the agency. 404 (3)(2)âThe complainant is not required to provide written 405 notice of the public record request to the agencyâs custodian of 406 public records as provided in paragraph (1)(b) if the agency 407 does not prominently post the contact information for the 408 agencyâs custodian of public records in the agencyâs primary 409 administrative building in which public records are routinely 410 created, sent, received, maintained, and requested and on the 411 agencyâs website, if the agency has a website. 412 (4)(3)âThe court shall determine whether the complainant 413 requested to inspect or copy a public record or participated in 414 the civil action for an improper purpose. If the court 415 determines there was an improper purpose, the court may not 416 assess and award the reasonable costs of enforcement, including 417 reasonable attorney fees, to the complainant, and shall assess 418 and award against the complainant and to the agency the 419 reasonable costs, including reasonable attorney fees, incurred 420 by the agency in responding to the civil action. For purposes of 421 this subsection, the term âimproper purposeâ means a request to 422 inspect or copy a public record or to participate in the civil 423 action primarily to cause a violation of this chapter or for a 424 frivolous purpose. 425 (5)(4)âThis section does not create a private right of 426 action authorizing the award of monetary damages for a person 427 who brings an action to enforce the provisions of this chapter. 428 Payments by the responsible agency may include only the 429 reasonable costs of enforcement, including reasonable attorney 430 fees, directly attributable to a civil action brought to enforce 431 the provisions of this chapter. 432 (6)âIf an individual is charged with a violation of this 433 chapter and is subsequently acquitted, the agency is authorized 434 to reimburse the individual for any portion of his or her 435 reasonable attorney fees. 436 Section 5.âSubsections (3) and (4) of section 119.15, 437 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 438 119.15âLegislative review of exemptions from public meeting 439 and public records requirements.â 440 (3)(a)âIn the 5th year after enactment of a new exemption 441 or substantial amendment of an existing exemption, the exemption 442 must shall be repealed on October 2 2nd of the 5th year, unless 443 the Legislature acts to reenact the exemption. 444 (b)âIn the 10th year after reenactment, the exemption must 445 be repealed on October 2 of the 10th year, unless the 446 Legislature acts to reenact the exemption. 447 (4)(a)âA law that enacts a new exemption or substantially 448 amends an existing exemption must state that the record or 449 meeting is: 450 1.âExempt from s. 24, Art. I of the State Constitution; 451 2.âExempt from s. 119.07(1) or s. 286.011; and 452 3.âRepealed at the end of 5 years and that the exemption 453 must be reviewed by the Legislature before the scheduled repeal 454 date, and every 10 years thereafter. 455 (b)âFor purposes of this section, an exemption is 456 substantially amended if the amendment expands the scope of the 457 exemption to include more records or information or to include 458 meetings as well as records. An exemption is not substantially 459 amended if the amendment narrows the scope of the exemption. 460 (c)âThis section is not intended to repeal an exemption 461 that has been amended following legislative review before the 462 scheduled repeal of the exemption if the exemption is not 463 substantially amended as a result of the review. 464 Section 6.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 465 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 466 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 467 chart.â 468 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 469 (c)âLEVEL 3 470 471 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 472 119.10(2)(b) 3rd Unlawful use of confidential information from police reports. 473 316.066â(3)(b)-(d) 3rd Unlawfully obtaining or using confidential crash reports. 474 316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 3rd conviction. 475 316.1935(2) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer in patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 476 319.30(4) 3rd Possession by junkyard of motor vehicle with identification number plate removed. 477 319.33(1)(a) 3rd Alter or forge any certificate of title to a motor vehicle or mobile home. 478 319.33(1)(c) 3rd Procure or pass title on stolen vehicle. 479 319.33(4) 3rd With intent to defraud, possess, sell, etc., a blank, forged, or unlawfully obtained title or registration. 480 327.35(2)(b) 3rd Felony BUI. 481 328.05(2) 3rd Possess, sell, or counterfeit fictitious, stolen, or fraudulent titles or bills of sale of vessels. 482 328.07(4) 3rd Manufacture, exchange, or possess vessel with counterfeit or wrong ID number. 483 376.302(5) 3rd Fraud related to reimbursement for cleanup expenses under the Inland Protection Trust Fund. 484 379.2431â(1)(e)5. 3rd Taking, disturbing, mutilating, destroying, causing to be destroyed, transferring, selling, offering to sell, molesting, or harassing marine turtles, marine turtle eggs, or marine turtle nests in violation of the Marine Turtle Protection Act. 485 379.2431â(1)(e)6. 3rd Possessing any marine turtle species or hatchling, or parts thereof, or the nest of any marine turtle species described in the Marine Turtle Protection Act. 486 379.2431â(1)(e)7. 3rd Soliciting to commit or conspiring to commit a violation of the Marine Turtle Protection Act. 487 400.9935(4)(a)âor (b) 3rd Operating a clinic, or offering services requiring licensure, without a license. 488 400.9935(4)(e) 3rd Filing a false license application or other required information or failing to report information. 489 440.1051(3) 3rd False report of workersâ compensation fraud or retaliation for making such a report. 490 501.001(2)(b) 2nd Tampers with a consumer product or the container using materially false/misleading information. 491 624.401(4)(a) 3rd Transacting insurance without a certificate of authority. 492 624.401(4)(b)1. 3rd Transacting insurance without a certificate of authority; premium collected less than $20,000. 493 626.902(1)(a) &â(b) 3rd Representing an unauthorized insurer. 494 697.08 3rd Equity skimming. 495 790.15(3) 3rd Person directs another to discharge firearm from a vehicle. 496 794.053 3rd Lewd or lascivious written solicitation of a person 16 or 17 years of age by a person 24 years of age or older. 497 800.045(3) 3rd Possess, control, or intentionally view any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes a lewd or lascivious image. 498 806.10(1) 3rd Maliciously injure, destroy, or interfere with vehicles or equipment used in firefighting. 499 806.10(2) 3rd Interferes with or assaults firefighter in performance of duty. 500 810.09(2)(b) 3rd Trespass on property other than structure or conveyance armed with firearm or dangerous weapon. 501 810.145(2)(c) 3rd Digital voyeurism; 19 years of age or older. 502 812.014(2)(c)2. 3rd Grand theft; $5,000 or more but less than $10,000. 503 812.0145(2)(c) 3rd Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $300 or more but less than $10,000. 504 812.015(8)(b) 3rd Retail theft with intent to sell; conspires with others. 505 812.081(2) 3rd Theft of a trade secret. 506 815.04(4)(b) 2nd Computer offense devised to defraud or obtain property. 507 817.034(4)(a)3. 3rd Engages in scheme to defraud (Florida Communications Fraud Act), property valued at less than $20,000. 508 817.233 3rd Burning to defraud insurer. 509 817.234â(8)(b) & (c) 3rd Unlawful solicitation of persons involved in motor vehicle accidents. 510 817.234(11)(a) 3rd Insurance fraud; property value less than $20,000. 511 817.236 3rd Filing a false motor vehicle insurance application. 512 817.2361 3rd Creating, marketing, or presenting a false or fraudulent motor vehicle insurance card. 513 817.413(2) 3rd Sale of used goods of $1,000 or more as new. 514 817.49(2)(b)1. 3rd Willful making of a false report of a crime causing great bodily harm, permanent disfigurement, or permanent disability. 515 831.28(2)(a) 3rd Counterfeiting a payment instrument with intent to defraud or possessing a counterfeit payment instrument with intent to defraud. 516 831.29 2nd Possession of instruments for counterfeiting driver licenses or identification cards. 517 836.13(2) 3rd Generating an altered sexual depiction of an identifiable person without consent. 518 836.13(4) 3rd Promoting, or possessing with intent to promote, an altered sexual depiction of an identifiable person without consent. 519 838.021(3)(b) 3rd Threatens unlawful harm to public servant. 520 847.01385 3rd Harmful communication to a minor. 521 860.15(3) 3rd Overcharging for repairs and parts. 522 870.01(2) 3rd Riot. 523 870.01(4) 3rd Inciting a riot. 524 893.13(1)(a)2. 3rd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis (or other s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs). 525 893.13(1)(d)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs within 1,000 feet of university. 526 893.13(1)(f)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs within 1,000 feet of public housing facility. 527 893.13(4)(c) 3rd Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substances. 528 893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of any controlled substance other than felony possession of cannabis. 529 893.13(7)(a)8. 3rd Withhold information from practitioner regarding previous receipt of or prescription for a controlled substance. 530 893.13(7)(a)9. 3rd Obtain or attempt to obtain controlled substance by fraud, forgery, misrepresentation, etc. 531 893.13(7)(a)10. 3rd Affix false or forged label to package of controlled substance. 532 893.13(7)(a)11. 3rd Furnish false or fraudulent material information on any document or record required by chapter 893. 533 893.13(8)(a)1. 3rd Knowingly assist a patient, other person, or owner of an animal in obtaining a controlled substance through deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent representations in or related to the practitionerâs practice. 534 893.13(8)(a)2. 3rd Employ a trick or scheme in the practitionerâs practice to assist a patient, other person, or owner of an animal in obtaining a controlled substance. 535 893.13(8)(a)3. 3rd Knowingly write a prescription for a controlled substance for a fictitious person. 536 893.13(8)(a)4. 3rd Write a prescription for a controlled substance for a patient, other person, or an animal if the sole purpose of writing the prescription is a monetary benefit for the practitioner. 537 918.13(1) 3rd Tampering with or fabricating physical evidence. 538 944.47â(1)(a)1. & 2. 3rd Introduce contraband to correctional facility. 539 944.47(1)(c) 2nd Possess contraband while upon the grounds of a correctional institution. 540 985.721 3rd Escapes from a juvenile facility (secure detention or residential commitment facility). 541 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.